Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1108.01
Learners with high ability; school districts; duties.

School districts shall annually provide the department with a copy of their criteria for identifying learners with high ability, the number of students identified according to the criteria, and the number of students participating in an approved accelerated or differentiated curriculum program. School districts shall also have a list of the students identified and how the students compare to the criteria available for inspection by department personnel.

Laws 1998, LB 1229, § 9.